arb-fnwords-lexc.txt
LEXICON Particles
+neg:0					Negation;
! إن وأخواتها
+confirm+subAcc^ss^إن^se^:^ss^إن^se^^dbl2^dbl	OptPronoun;
! moved
!+subAcc^ss^أن^se^:^ss^أن^se^^dbl2^dbl				OptPronoun;
^ss^كأن^se^^dbl2^dbl			OptPronoun;
^ss^لكن^se^^dbl2^dbl			OptPronoun;
^ss^ليت^se^				OptPronoun;
^ss^لعل^se^				OptPronoun;

! حروف الاستثناء
^ss^إلا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^غير^se^				OptPronoun;
^ss^سوى^se^				OptPronoun;
^ss^عدا^se^				OptPronoun;

! حروف الاستقبال
^ss^سوف+fut^se^:^ss^سوف^se^		WordEnd;

! أن المصدرية
+comp+subAcc^ss^أن^se^:^ss^أن^se^^dbl2^dbl		WordEnd;

! إن مقول القول
+comp+subAcc^ss^إن^se^:^ss^إن^se^^dbl2^dbl		WordEnd;

^ss^كي^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لكي^se^				WordEnd;

^ss^قد^se^				WordEnd;

^ss^كما^se^				WordEnd;

! أدوات الشرط
^ss^لو^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^إذا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^إن^se^				WordEnd;


^ss^إما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^إنما^se^				WordEnd;

! Misc
^ss^لأن^se^:^ss^لأن^se^^dbl3^dbl			OptPronoun;
^ss^بأن^se^:^ss^بأن^se^^dbl3^dbl			OptPronoun;
^ss^ألا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بألا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بم^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^عما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^عمن^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^فيما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^كذا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لئلا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لابد^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لاسيما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لذا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لقد^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^لولا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^مثلما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^مما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^ممن^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^مهما^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^نعم^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^هكذا^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^اللهم^se^				WordEnd;

! Multi-Word Expressions
^ss^بمثابة^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بمجرد^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بواسطة^se^				WordEnd;


LEXICON Modals
! من أخوات كان
^ss^عسى^se^				OptPronoun;

^ss^بئس^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^بئست^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^نعم^se^				WordEnd;
^ss^نعمت^se^				WordEnd;

^ss^أمكن^se^				OptPronoun;
^ss^يمكن^se^				OptPronoun;

LEXICON OptPronoun
+token				CompoundPronoun;
					WordEnd;

LEXICON WordEnd
+token					#;

LEXICON CompoundPronoun
! clitic objects
!1pers
ـي+objcon+1pers+sg@U.NUMBER.SG@@U.FI.OFF@:ـي@U.NUMBER.SG@@U.FI.OFF@	MarkCompound;
ـنا+objcon+1pers+pl:ـنا							MarkCompound;

!2pers
ـك+objcon+2pers+sg+masc@U.NUMBER.SG@:ـك@U.NUMBER.SG@				MarkCompound;
ـك+objcon+2pers+sg+fem@U.NUMBER.SG@:ـك@U.NUMBER.SG@				MarkCompound;
ـكم+objconم+2pers+pl+masc@U.NUMBER.PL@:ـكم@U.NUMBER.PL@				MarkCompound;
ـكن+objcon+2pers+pl+fem@U.NUMBER.PL@:ـكن@U.NUMBER.PL@			MarkCompound;
ـكما+objcon+2pers+dual:ـكما							MarkCompound;

!3pers
ـها+objcon+3pers+sg+fem@U.NUMBER.SG@:ـها@U.NUMBER.SG@			MarkCompound;
ـه+objcon+3pers+sg+masc@U.NUMBER.SG@:ـه@U.NUMBER.SG@				MarkCompound;
ـهما+objcon+3pers+dual:ـهما							MarkCompound;
ـهم+objcon+3pers+pl+masc@U.NUMBER.PL@:ـهم@U.NUMBER.PL@			MarkCompound;
ـهن+objcon+3pers+pl+fem@U.NUMBER.PL@:ـهن@U.NUMBER.PL@			MarkCompound;

LEXICON MarkCompound				
+token								#;
